Utah statutes.
41-6a-213.   Persons riding or driving animals subject to chapter -- Exceptions.

(1)  Except as provided under Subsection (2), a person who is riding an animal or who is driving an animal-drawn vehicle on a roadway is subject to this chapter.

(2)  Driver license sanctions for alcohol or drug related traffic offenses do not apply to a person specified under Subsection (1).

